New York, session 2025-2026, A1420.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 11-0524 of the environmental conservation law is 2 amended by adding two new subdivisions 6 and 7 to read as follows: 3 6. Before a nuisance wildlife control operator undertakes any control 4 measures, such nuisance wildlife control operator shall provide, to the 5 client, in writing, a statement indicating that euthanasia may be used 6 as a method to resolve the wildlife issue. 7 7. The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations 8 necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 10 law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any 11 rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on its 12 effective date are authorized to be made on or before such effective 13 date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04301-01-5